Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF40.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1878XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 40 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 327F.6 Defect detectors. 1 1. A railroad company shall install and maintain at least 2 one defect detector on or along every railway branch line upon 3 which the company operates a train, and if the railway branch 4 line is longer than fifteen miles, the railroad company shall 5 install and maintain at least one defect detector every fifteen 6 miles. Railroad companies that operate on the same railway 7 may jointly share the costs associated with installing and 8 maintaining defect detectors under this subsection. 9 2. a. A railroad company that operates a train on a railway 10 branch line that does not have a defect detector installed and 11 maintained in accordance with subsection 1 is subject to a 12 schedule âfiveâ penalty under section 327C.5 for every mile of 13 the branch line, or if the branch line is longer than fifteen 14 miles, for every mile of the branch line that is more than 15 fifteen miles away from a defect detector, as applicable. 16 b. A railroad company is subject to a schedule âfiveâ 17 penalty under section 327C.5 for each time a train crosses or 18 passes by a defect detector that fails to notify the train crew 19 of a detected defect. 20 3. Railroad companies that operate on the same railway 21 branch line are jointly and severally liable in any suit 22 arising from the installation and maintenance of all defect 23 detectors, or lack thereof, on or along the branch line. 24 4. As used in this section, âdefect detectorâ means a 25 device, regardless of whether the device is integrated into 26 the railway, equipped with sensors that detect axle and brake 27 abnormalities on a passing train and alert the train crew of 28 any detected abnormality. 29